Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5311.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1812a. If a parent or legal guardian intentionally presents false information regarding the name, age, or residency of their child for the purpose of enrolling the child in a nonresident district, the child is eligible to enroll in that nonresident district through only an interdistrict choice, cooperative agreement, or program authorized under sections 1147 to 1148a for the school year following the provision of the false information described in this section. A child must not be unenrolled from the child's school during the school year under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5310 (request no. H03337'25). (b) House Bill No. 5312 (request no. H03337'25 a). Enacting section 2. Section 1812 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1812, is repealed.